it: Profondità di bit massima: 12 bit; 16 bit; 20 bit; 24 bit; 32-bit; 48 bit; 8 bit; Altro
bg-BG: Максимална битова дълбочина: 12-битов; 16-битов; 20-битова; 24-битов; 32-битов; 48-битова; 8-битов; Други
ko: 최대 비트 깊이: 12비트; 16비트; 20비트; 24비트; 32비트; 48비트; 8비트; 기타
de: Maximale Bittiefe: 12-Bit; 16-Bit; 20-Bit; 24-Bit; 32-Bit; 48-Bit; 8-Bit; Sonstiges
th: ความลึกบิตสูงสุด: 12 บิต; 16 บิต; 20 บิต; 24 บิต; 32-bit; 48 บิต; 8 บิต; อื่นๆ
ru: Максимальная битовая глубина: 12-битный; 16-битный; 20 бит; 24-битный; 32-битный; 48-бит; 8-битный; Другой
nl: Maximale bitdiepte: 12-bit; 16-bit; 20-bit; 24-bit; 32-bits; 48-bit; 8-bit; Andere
zh-TW: 最大位元深度: 12 位元; 16 位元; 20 位元; 24 位元; 32 位元; 48 位元; 8 位元; 其他
en: Maximum bit depth: 12-bit; 16-bit; 20-bit; 24-bit; 32-bit; 48-bit; 8-bit; Other
fr: Profondeur de bits maximale: 12 bits; 16 bits; 20 bits; 24 bits; 32 bits; 48 bits; 8 bits; Autre
pl: Maksymalna głębia bitowa: 12-bitowa; 16-bitowa; 20-bitowa; 24-bitowa; 32-bitowy; 48-bitowa; 8-bitowa; Inne
el: Μέγιστο βάθος bit: 12-bit; 16-bit; 20-bit; 24-bit; 32-bit; 48-bit; 8-bit; Άλλο
nb: Maksimal bitdybde: 12-bit; 16-bit; 20-bit; 24-bit; 32-bit; 48-bit; 8-bit; Annet
sk-SK: Maximálna bitová hĺbka: 12-bitový; 16-bitový; 20-bitový; 24-bitový; 32-bitový; 48-bitová; 8-bitový; Iné
lt-LT: Maksimalus bitų gylis: 12 bitų; 16 bitų; 20 bitų; 24 bitų; 32 bitai; 48 bitų; 8 bitų; Kita
hu: Maximális bitmélység: 12 bites; 16 bites; 20 bites; 24 bites; 32 bites; 48 bites; 8 bites; Egyéb
hr-HR: Maksimalna dubina bita: 12-bitni; 16-bitni; 20-bitni; 24-bitni; 32-bitni; 48-bitna; 8-bitni; Ostalo
cs: Maximální bitová hloubka: 12-bit; 16-bit; 20bitová; 24-bit; 32bitová; 48bitová; 8-bit; Jiné
sv: Maximalt bitdjup: 12-bitars; 16-bitars; 20-bitar; 24-bitars; 32-bitars; 48-bitar; 8-bitars; Övrigt
tr: Maksimum bit derinliği: 12 bit; 16 bit; 20-bit; 24 bit; 32 bit; 48-bit; 8 bit; Diğer
da: Definerer den højeste digitale ordlængde (i bit) som konverteren understøtter, hvilket påvirker dynamikområde og opløsning.: 12-bit; 16-bit; 20-bit; 24-bit; 32-bit; 48-bit; 8-bit; Andet
es: Profundidad de bits máxima: 12 bits; 16 bits; 20 bits; 24 bits; 32 bits; 48 bits; 8 bits; Otros
fi: Maksimibittisyvyys: 12-bittinen; 16-bittinen; 20-bittinen; 24-bittinen; 32-bittinen; 48-bittinen; 8-bittinen; Muu
pt-BR: Profundidade máxima de bits: 12 bits; 16 bits; 20 bits; 24 bits; 32 bits; 48 bits; 8 bits; Outro
ro-RO: Adâncime maximă de biți: 12 biți; 16 biți; 20 biți; 24 biți; 32 de biți; 48 biți; 8 biți; Altele
sl-SI: Največja bitna globina: 12-bitna; 16-bitna; 20-bitni; 24-bitna; 32-bitni; 48-bitna; 8-bitna; Drugo
zh-CN: 最大位深度: 12 位; 16 位; 20 位; 24 位; 32 位; 48 位; 8 位; 其他
ja: 最大ビット深度: 12ビット; 16ビット; 20ビット; 24ビット; 32ビット; 48ビット; 8ビット; その他
vi: Độ sâu bit tối đa: 12-bit; 16-bit; 20-bit; 24-bit; 32 bit; 48-bit; 8-bit; Khác
pt-PT: Profundidade máxima de bits: 12 bits; 16 bits; 20 bits; 24 bits; 32-bit; 48 bits; 8 bits; Outro